Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201449-1457
Political party
committee; campaign statement; contents, enumerated; contribution and expenditure
information.

(1) The campaign statement filed
by a political party committee shall contain the following information:

(a) The full name and street address of each person from
whom contributions totaling more
than two hundred fifty dollars in value are received in a calendar year, the amount, and
the date or dates contributed; and if the person is a committee, the name
and address of the committee and the full name and street address of the committee
treasurer, together with the amount of the contribution and the date received;

(b) An itemized list of all expenditures, including in-kind
contributions and expenditures and loans, made during the period covered by
the campaign statement which were contributions to a candidate committee of
a candidate for elective office or a ballot question committee; or independent
expenditures in support of the qualification, passage, or defeat of a ballot
question, or in support of the nomination or election of a candidate for elective
office or the defeat of any of the candidate's opponents;

(c) The total expenditure by the committee for each candidate
for elective office or ballot question in whose behalf an independent expenditure
was made or a contribution was given for the election; and

(d) The filer's name, address, and telephone number, if any,
and the full name, residential and business addresses, and telephone numbers
of the committee treasurer.

(2) A contribution to a candidate or ballot question committee
listed under subdivision (1)(b) of this section shall note the name and address
of the committee, the name of the candidate and the office sought, if any,
the amount contributed, and the date of the contribution.

(3) An independent expenditure listed under subdivision (1)(b)
of this section shall note the name of the candidate for whose benefit the
expenditure was made and the office sought by the candidate, or a brief description
of the ballot question for which the expenditure was made, the amount, date,
and purpose of the expenditure, and the full name and address of the person
to whom the expenditure was made.

(4) An expenditure listed which was made in support of more
than one candidate or ballot question, or both, shall be apportioned reasonably
among the candidates or ballot questions, or both.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 57;

Laws 1999, LB 416, § 9;

Laws 2013, LB79, § 11;

Laws 2014, LB946, § 27.
January 1, 2015